Utah statutes.
46-4-502.   Providing services or information electronically -- Interpretation of terms in Utah Code.

(1)  To provide services or information electronically, a state governmental entity may implement the terms listed in Subsection (2) in accordance with this section:

(a)  when the term is used in the Utah Code; and

(b)  if the implementation is not:

(i)  inconsistent with the manifest intent of the Legislature; or

(ii)  repugnant to the context of the statute.

(2)  Subsection (1) applies to the terms listed in this Subsection (2).

(a)  "Copy" may include an electronic version of a document.

(b)  "Mail" may include sending a document electronically if the recipient can accept and process the electronic writing.

(c)  "Mailing address" may include an electronic mailing address capable of receiving and processing an electronic writing.

(d)  "Sign" or "signature" may include any form of electronic signature authorized by the governmental agency.

(e)  "Written" or "writing" may include information that is:

(i)  inscribed on a tangible medium; or

(ii) (A)  stored in an electronic or other medium; and

(B)  is retrievable in a perceivable form.



Amended by Chapter 20, 2003 General Session

